test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-amisk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - amiskw - ok : # -m animate noun, beaver # quite unsure about the diminutives
     amisk+N+AN+Sg: amisk
     amisk+N+AN+Pl: amiskwak
     amisk+N+AN+Loc: amiskonâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Obv: amiskwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [amiskos, amiskosis] 
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [amiskosak, amiskosisak]
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [amiskosisinâhk, amiskosinâhk]
     
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitamiskom
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitamiskom
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otamiskoma
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitamiskominân
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitamiskominaw
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitamiskomiwâw
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otamiskomiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitamiskomak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitamiskomak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otamiskoma
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitamiskominânak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitamiskominawak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitamiskomiwâwak
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otamiskomiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otamiskomiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicamiskomis 
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicamiskomis
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicamiskomisinân
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicamiskomisinaw
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicamiskomisiwâw
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicamiskomisak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicamiskomisak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicamiskomisinânak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicamiskomisinawak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicamiskomisiwâwak
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiwâwa
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocamiskomisiyiwa
     
     amisk+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otamiskomihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otamiskomiyihk
     amisk+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitamiskominâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitamiskominâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitamiskomiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otamiskomiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otamiskomiyihk

     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicamiskomisihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicamiskomisihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocamiskomisihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocamiskomisiyihk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicamiskomisinâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicamiskomisinâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicamiskomisiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocamiskomisiwâhk
     amisk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocamiskomisiyihk
     
